Hawaii statutes.
§523A-56 Posting copy of report; notice of
interest and intention to claim; determination of asserted interest. (a)
When a report is received from the Comptroller General or other proper officer
of the United States, the director shall give the notice described in
subsection (b) not later than May 1 of the year immediately following the
report required by section 523A-54, at least once statewide.

(b) The public notice shall contain:

(1) The names in alphabetical order and last known
address, if any, of any person listed in the report with property valued
greater than $100;

(2) A statement identifying the location of a list of
names and last known addresses, if any, of persons appearing to be owners of
abandoned property; and stating that this list shall be made available as a
government record; and

(3) A statement that information concerning the
property and the name and last known address of the holder may be obtained by
any person possessing an interest in the property by addressing an inquiry to the
director.

(c) The director shall not be required to list
in the notice any items of less than $50 unless the director considers the
notice to be in the public interest. Any person asserting an interest in
property described in the report may elect to claim against the United States,
under the laws of the United States, in which event and within ninety days
following the date of initial public notice the person shall notify the
director of the person's asserted interest and intention to so claim. The director
shall omit the property from any claim by the State until the asserted interest
may be finally determined against the claimant. The interest shall not
thereafter be asserted against the State. [L 1988, c 93, pt of §2; am L 1996, c
214, §8; am L 1998, c 2, §109]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next